District of Columbia statutes.
47-3152

Use of credit card information in connection with payment by check.

(a)

No person shall imprint the information contained on a drawer’s credit card or other form of identification on the face or on the back of a check used as payment for goods or services, nor shall any person record in any manner the number of a drawer’s credit card or other form of identification as a condition to accepting a check as payment for the sale of goods or services. Nothing herein shall be deemed to prohibit a person from requesting, but not requiring, that a drawer voluntarily display a credit card or other form of identification as an additional form of identification, provided that the only information recorded concerning the credit card or other form of identification is the type of credit card or other form of identification so displayed and its expiration date where applicable.

(b)

Where a second form of identification is requested, the merchant must inform the purchaser of the range of acceptable second forms of identification and post a listing of the range of acceptable second forms of identification in at least one location clearly visible to the purchaser within the merchant’s place of business.

History

Mar. 11, 1992, D.C. Law 9-69, § 3, 39 DCR 16
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-88, § 2, 45 DCR 1230

Section References

This section is referenced in § 47-3154.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-3152.